Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.72.005

Trust companies under former Title 30 RCW.

Trust companies under Title 30 RCW, as it existed on January 5, 2015, shall automatically succeed to and be subject to all powers and authorities, rights and obligations, privileges and immunities, and discretions of a state trust company under this title.

[ 2014 c 37 s 401.]